Maryland, session 2026, SB0561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–141.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0561*

SENATE BILL 561
(2) “Certified violence prevention professional” means a prevention
professional who meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(3) “Community violence” means intentional acts of interpersonal violence
committed in public areas by individuals who are not family members or intimate partners
of the victim.
(4) (i) “Community violence prevention services” means
evidence–based, trauma–informed, supportive, and nonpsychotherapeutic services
provided by a certified violence prevention professional, within or outside a clinical setting,
for the purpose of promoting improved health outcomes and positive behavioral change,
preventing injury recidivism, and reducing the likelihood that an individual who is the
victim of community violence will commit or promote violence.
(ii) “Community violence prevention services” includes peer support
and counseling, mentorship, conflict mediation, crisis intervention, targeted case
management referrals to certified or licensed health care professionals or social services
providers, patient education, and screening services to victims of violence.
(5) “DISTANT SITE PROVIDER” MEANS THE CERTIFIED VIOLENCE
PREVENTION SPECIALIST WHO PROVIDES COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION
SERVICES TO A PROGRAM RECIPIENT AT AN ORIGINATING SITE FROM A DIFFERENT
PHYSICAL LOCATION THAN THE LOCATION OF THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT.
[(5)] (6) “Interpersonal violence” means the intentional use of physical
force or power against another individual by an individual or a small group of individuals.
(7) “ORIGINATING SITE” MEANS THE LOCATION OF THE PROGRAM
RECIPIENT DURING THE PROVISION OF COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION
SERVICES THROUGH TELEHEALTH.
[(6)] (8) “Prevention professional” has the meaning provided by the
National Uniform Claim Committee, or its successor, under Code Number 405300000X.
(9) (I) “TELEHEALTH” MEANS THE DELIVERY OF COMMUNITY
VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES TO A PROGRAM RECIPIENT AT AN ORIGINATING
SITE BY A CERTIFIED VIOLENCE PREVENTION PROFESSIONAL THROUGH THE USE OF
TECHNOLOGY–ASSISTED COMMUNICATION.
(II) “TELEHEALTH” INCLUDES:
1. SYNCHRONOUS AND ASYNCHRONOUS INTERACTIONS;
AND

SENATE BILL 561 3
2. AN AUDIO–ONLY TELEPHONE CONVERSATION
BETWEEN A CERTIFIED VIOLENCE PREVENTION PROFESSIONAL AND A PROGRAM
RECIPIENT THAT RESULTS IN THE DELIVERY OF BILLABLE, COVERED COMMUNITY
VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES.
(III) “TELEHEALTH” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE PROVISION OF
COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES SOLELY THROUGH:
1. AN E–MAIL MESSAGE; OR
2. A FACSIMILE TRANSMISSION.
(b) The Program [shall]:
(1) SHALL provide community violence prevention services to Program
recipients who have:
[(1)] (i) 1. Been exposed to community violence; or
[(ii)] 2. A personal history of injury sustained as a result of an act
of community violence; and
[(2)] (II) Been referred by a certified or licensed health care provider or
social services provider to a certified violence prevention professional to receive community
violence prevention services after the provider makes a determination that the Program
recipient is at an elevated risk of violent injury or retaliation resulting from another act of
community violence;
(2) SHALL REIMBURSE FOR COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION
SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT ARE PROVIDED IN
PERSON, REGARDLESS OF THE LOCATION AT WHICH THE SERVICES WERE
PROVIDED;
(3) SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES
APPROPRIATELY DELIVERED THROUGH TELEHEALTH TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
REGARDLESS OF THE LOCATION OF THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT AT THE TIME
TELEHEALTH SERVICES ARE PROVIDED; AND
(II) ALLOW A DISTANT SITE PROVIDER TO PROVIDE COMMUNITY
VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES TO A PROGRAM RECIPIENT FROM ANY LOCATION
AT WHICH THE COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES MAY BE
APPROPRIATELY DELIVERED THROUGH TELEHEALTH; AND

SENATE BILL 561
(4) MAY NOT EXCLUDE FROM COVERAGE A COMMUNITY VIOLENCE
PREVENTION SERVICE:
(I) SOLELY BECAUSE IT IS PROVIDED THROUGH TELEHEALTH
AND IS NOT PROVIDED THROUGH AN IN–PERSON CONSULTATION OR CONTACT
BETWEEN A CERTIFIED VIOLENCE PREVENTION PROFESSIONAL AND A PROGRAM
RECIPIENT; OR
(II) PROVIDED TO A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IN PERSON SOLELY
BECAUSE THE COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICE MAY ALSO BE
PROVIDED THROUGH TELEHEALTH.
(c) A prevention professional seeking certification as a certified violence
prevention professional shall:
(1) Complete [an accredited] A training and certification program for
certified violence prevention professionals, approved in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section; and
(2) Maintain the certification completed under item (1) of this subsection.
(d) [On or before January 1, 2023, the] THE Department shall approve at least
[one accredited] THREE training and certification [program] PROGRAMS for certified
violence prevention professionals, which shall include:
(1) At least 35 hours of initial training, addressing the following:
(i) The profound effects of trauma and violence and the basics of
trauma–informed care;
(ii) Community violence prevention strategies, including conflict
mediation and retaliation prevention related to community violence;
(iii) Case management and advocacy practices; and
(iv) Patient privacy and the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996; and
(2) At least 6 hours of continuing education every 2 years.
(e) An entity that employs or contracts with a certified violence prevention
professional to provide community violence prevention services [shall]:

SENATE BILL 561 5
(1) [Maintain] SHALL MAINTAIN documentation that the certified
violence prevention professional has met the requirements of subsection (c) of this section;
[and]
(2) [Ensure] SHALL ENSURE that the certified violence prevention
professional is providing community violence prevention services in compliance with any
applicable standard of care, rule, regulation, and State or federal law; AND
(3) MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO MAINTAIN AN AFFILIATION WITH A
HOSPITAL OR TRAUMA CENTER.
(f) This section may not be construed to alter the scope of practice for any health
care professional.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.